test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-xosjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Subord/бˮна2+PxPl3: [хоӈгоб”нандо’, хоӈгоба”нандо’, хоӈгодаб”нандо’]
     хось+V+TV+Evas+Abs: ховоӈгад
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxSg1: [ховоӈгадан, ховоӈгадани, ховоӈгадни]
#     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxSg1.2: [ховоӈгадани, ховоӈгадни]
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxSg2: ховоӈгаданд
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxSg3: ховоӈгаданда
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxDu1: [ховоӈгадани’, ховоӈгадни’]
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxDu2: ховоӈгаданди’
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxDu3: ховоӈгаданди’
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxPl1: [ховоӈгадана”, ховоӈгадна”]
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxPl2: ховоӈгаданда”
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxPl3: ховоӈгадандо’
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxSg1: [ховон, хованон]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxSg2: [ховонд, хованонд]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxSg3: [ховонда, хованонда]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxDu1: [ховони’, хованони’]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxDu2: [ховонди’, хованонди’]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxDu3: [ховонди’, хованонди’]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxPl1: [ховона”, хованона”]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxPl2: [ховонда”, хованонда”]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Aor+PxPl3: [ховондо’, хованондо’]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxSg1: [ховонась, хованонась]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxSg2: [ховондась, хованондась]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxSg3: [ховондась, хованондась]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxDu1: [ховонинзь, хованонинзь]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxDu2: [ховондинзь, хованондинзь]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxDu3: [ховондинзь, хованондинзь]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxPl1: [ховонаць, хованонаць]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxPl2: [ховондаць, хованондаць]
     хось+V+TV+Aud+Prt1+PxPl3: [ховондонзь, хованондонзь]
 #: 
 #: ◊_subj
 #: 
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ходм’
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: хон
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хо
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: хони’
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ходи’
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хоӈаха’
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: хова”
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: хода”
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хо”
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: ходамзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: хонась
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хось
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: хонинзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: ходинзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хоӈаханзь
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ховаць
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ходаць
     хось+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хоць
     хось+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1: хоходм’
     хось+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1: хохони’
     хось+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1: хохова”
     хось+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2: хо”
     хось+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2: ходи’
     хось+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2: хода”
     хось+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3: хоя
     хось+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3: хояха’
     хось+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3: хоя”
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: хоидм’
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: хоин
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: хои
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: хоини’
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: хоиди’
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: хоихи’
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: хоива”
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: хоида”
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: хои”
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: хоидамзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: хоинась
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: хоись
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: хоининзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: хоидинзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: хоихинзь
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: хоиваць
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: хоидаць
     хось+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: хоиць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg1: хобцудм’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg2: хобцун
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScSg3: хобцу
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu1: хобцуни’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu2: хобцуди’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScDu3: хобцуху’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl1: хобцува”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl2: хобцуда”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/nec+ScPl3: хобцу”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg1: хосадм’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg2: хосан
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScSg3: хоса
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu1: хосани’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu2: хосади’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScDu3: хосаха’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl1: хосава”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl2: хосада”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/int+ScPl3: хоса”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: ховэдм’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: ховэн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: ховы
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: ховэни’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: ховэди’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: ховэхэ’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: ховэва”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: ховэда”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: ховы”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1: ховэдамзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2: ховэнась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3: [ховысь, ховэсь]
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1: ховэнинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2: ховэдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3: ховэхэнзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1: ховэваць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2: ховэдаць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3: [ховыць, ховэць]
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1: хонакэдм’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2: хонакэн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3: хонакы
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1: хонакэни’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2: хонакэди’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3: хонакэхэ’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1: хонакэва”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2: хонакэда”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3: хонакы”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg1: хобцакэдм’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg2: хобцакэн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg3: хобцакы
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu1: хобцакэни’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu2: хобцакэди’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu3: хобцакэхэ’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl1: хобцакэва”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl2: хобцакэда”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl3: хобцакы”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg1: хонарахадм’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg2: хонарахан
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg3: хонараха
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu1: хонарахани’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu2: хонарахади’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu3: хонарахаха’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl1: хонарахава”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl2: хонарахада”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl3: хонараха”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg1: хонарахадамзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg2: хонараханась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg3: хонарахась
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu1: хонараханинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu2: хонарахадинзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu3: хонарахаханзь
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl1: хонарахаваць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl2: хонарахадаць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl3: хонарахаць
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg1: ховэрахадм’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg2: ховэрахан
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg3: ховэраха
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu1: ховэрахани’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu2: ховэрахади’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu3: ховэрахаха’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl1: ховэрахава”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl2: ховэрахада”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl3: ховэраха”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1: [ховандархадм’, ховндархадм’]
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2: [ховандархан, ховндархан]
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3: [ховандарха, ховндарха]
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1: [ховандархани’, ховндархани’]
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2: [ховандархади’, ховндархади’]
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3: [ховандархаха’, ховндархаха’]
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1: [ховандархава”, ховндархава”]
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2: [ховандархада”, ховндархада”]
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3: [ховандарха”, ховндарха”]
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg1: хованӈгабядм’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg2: хованӈгабян
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg3: хованӈгабя
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu1: хованӈгабяни’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu2: хованӈгабяди’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu3: хованӈгабяха’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl1: хованӈгабява”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl2: хованӈгабяда”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl3: хованӈгабя”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1: хорхавэдм’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2: хорхавэн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3: хорхавы
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1: хорхавэни’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2: хорхавэди’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3: хорхавэхэ’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1: хорхавэва”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2: хорхавэда”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3: хорхавы”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1: ховэкэдм’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2: ховэкэн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3: ховэкы
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1: ховэкэни’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2: ховэкэди’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3: ховэкэхэ’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1: ховэкэва”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2: ховэкэда”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3: ховэкы”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg1: ховнадм’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg2: ховнан
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg3: ховна
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu1: ховнани’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu2: ховнади’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu3: ховнаха’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl1: ховнава”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl2: ховнада”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl3: ховна”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1: хорвадм’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2: хорван
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3: хорва
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1: хорвани’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2: хорвади’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3: хорваха’
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1: хорвава”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2: хорвада”
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3: хорва”
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: хоӈгудм’
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: хоӈгун
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хоӈгу
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: хоӈгуни’
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: хоӈгуди’
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хоӈгуху’
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: хоӈгува”
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: хоӈгуда”
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хоӈгу”
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: хоӈгудамзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: хоӈгунась
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хоӈгусь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: хоӈгунинзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: хоӈгудинзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хоӈгухунзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: хоӈгуваць
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: хоӈгудаць
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хоӈгуць
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1: [хоӈгодакэдм’, хоӈгоданакэдм’]
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2: [хоӈгодакэн, хоӈгоданакэн]
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3: [хоӈгодакы, хоӈгоданакы]
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1: [хоӈгодакэни’, хоӈгоданакэни’]
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2: [хоӈгодакэди’, хоӈгоданакэди’]
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3: [хоӈгодакэхэ’, хоӈгоданакэхэ’]
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1: [хоӈгодакэва”, хоӈгоданакэва”]
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2: [хоӈгодакэда”, хоӈгоданакэда”]
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3: [хоӈгодакы”, хоӈгоданакы”]
     хось+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScSg1: [хохорцюдм’, хохорцядм’]
     хось+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScDu1: [хохорцюни’, хохорцяни’]
     хось+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScPl1: [хохорцюва”, хохорцява”]
     хось+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScSg2: хохор”
     хось+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScDu2: [хохор”ӈади’, хохорӈади’]
     хось+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScPl2: [хохор”ӈада”, хохорӈада”]
     хось+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScSg3: [хохор”ӈая, хохорӈая]
     хось+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScDu3: [хохор”ӈаяха’, хохорӈаяха’]
     хось+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3: [хохор”ӈая”, хохорӈая”]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: [хосьтыдм’, хосетыдм’]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: [хосьтын, хосетын]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [хосьты, хосеты]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: [хосьтыни’, хосетыни’]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: [хосьтыди’, хосетыди’]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [хосьтыхы’, хосетыхы’]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: [хосьтыва”, хосетыва”]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: [хосьтыда”, хосетыда”]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [хосьты”, хосеты”]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1: [хосьтавэдм’, хосетавэдм’]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2: [хосьтавэн, хосетавэн]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3: [хосьтавы, хосетавы]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1: [хосьтавэни’, хосетавэни’]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2: [хосьтавэди’, хосетавэди’]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3: [хосьтавэхэ’, хосетавэхэ’]
